algorithms/persian.sbl
/*
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* Persian Stemmer (HPS-like)
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* Based on the paper:
*   "HPS: A Hierarchical Persian Stemming Method"
*   Ayshe Rashidi, Mina Zolfy Lighvan (2014)
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* Differences from original HPS:
* 1) No POS-tagger stage:
*      - HPS uses a POS tagger to route tokens to Noun, Adjective, or Verb
*        suffix rules directly.
*      - Here we fall back to the fixed order: Noun → Adjective → Verb
*        when POS is unknown.
*      Reason: Implementation is tagger-agnostic and lightweight.
* 2) Lexical "-AN" guard:
*      - Added `Protect_Lexical_AN` to avoid stripping true lexical endings
*        like "...stan", "...ran", and known stems (Iran, Tehran, Ensan).
*      Reason: reduces over-stemming where HPS relied on explicit hash lists.
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* PIPELINE (HPS-like, POS-tagger free):
*   1) Normalize characters : unify Arabic variants; delete ZWJ/spaces
*      (ZWNJ preserved for step 2; deleted after prefix stripping)
*   2) Strip start-anchored prefixes (repeatable)
*   3) Iteratively peel one suffix layer per pass, in fixed order:
*        Noun → Adjective → Verb
*      If a noun rule fires, the pass is frozen (no adj/verb in that pass).
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
* Implemented by: https://saeiddrv.com
* -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
*/

stringescapes { }

// ============================================================================
//  Alphabet & special symbols
// ============================================================================
stringdef alef       '{U+0627}'
stringdef aa         '{U+0622}'
stringdef be         '{U+0628}'
stringdef pe         '{U+067E}'
stringdef te         '{U+062A}'
stringdef se         '{U+062B}'
stringdef jim        '{U+062C}'
stringdef che        '{U+0686}'
stringdef heh_jimi   '{U+062D}'
stringdef khe        '{U+062E}'
stringdef dal        '{U+062F}'
stringdef zal        '{U+0630}'
stringdef re         '{U+0631}'
stringdef ze         '{U+0632}'
stringdef zhe        '{U+0698}'
stringdef sin        '{U+0633}'
stringdef shin       '{U+0634}'
stringdef sad        '{U+0635}'
stringdef zad        '{U+0636}'
stringdef ta         '{U+0637}'
stringdef za         '{U+0638}'
stringdef ain        '{U+0639}'
stringdef ghain      '{U+063A}'
stringdef fe         '{U+0641}'
stringdef ghaf       '{U+0642}'
stringdef kaf        '{U+06A9}'
stringdef gaf        '{U+06AF}'
stringdef lam        '{U+0644}'
stringdef mim        '{U+0645}'
stringdef nun        '{U+0646}'
stringdef vav        '{U+0648}'
stringdef heh        '{U+0647}'
stringdef ye         '{U+06CC}'

stringdef space             '{U+0020}'
stringdef zero_width_joiner '{U+200D}'
stringdef half_space        '{U+200C}' // zero-width non-joiner (ZWNJ)
// Note: U+200C (ZERO WIDTH NON-JOINER) is commonly referred to as "nim-faseleh" ("half-space") in Persian.
// Although this name is not standard in English Unicode terminology, it reflects its widespread use
// in Persian as a morpheme separator within words. This character is here to normalize

// Arabic variants to normalize → Persian forms
stringdef ar_kaf                   '{U+0643}'
stringdef ar_ye                    '{U+064A}'
stringdef ar_ye_with_hamza_above   '{U+0626}'
stringdef ar_heh                   '{U+06C1}'
stringdef ar_he_marbuta            '{U+0629}'
stringdef ar_alef_with_hamza_above '{U+0623}'
stringdef ar_alef_with_hamza_below '{U+0625}'
stringdef ar_vav_with_hamza_above  '{U+0624}'

// ============================================================================
//  Declarations (routines, flags, and marks)
// ============================================================================
routines (
  Normalize_Characters  // Forward: Unicode/script normalization
  Strip_Prefix_At_Start // Forward: anchored prefix peeling (one per call)
  Delete_ZWNJ           // Forward: delete remaining ZWNJs after prefix stripping
  Protect_Lexical_AN    // Probe: flag lexical -AN endings (per pass)

  // Noun tier (HPS categories)
  AN_LexHash N_Hash
  Noun_Possessive  Noun_Plural  Noun_Other  Stem_Noun
  Adjective_Superlative_Comparative  Adjective_Derivational
  Adjective_Relative Stem_Adjective
  Participle_Clitic_Tails
  Verb_Person_Endings  Verb_Tense_Mood_Markers  Stem_Verb
)

externals ( stem )

// Guard flags:
//  - 'protect_lex_an'    : true when final -AN is lexical (not plural) in this pass.
//  - 'saw_present_prefix': true when a present-tense prefix (mi-/nemi-) is stripped;
//                          used to enable verb person-ending rules in this pass.
//  - 'saw_inf_or_part'   : true when an infinitive (-n/an) or participle (-h) is stripped;
//                          also enables verb person-ending rules in this pass.
booleans ( protect_lex_an saw_present_prefix saw_inf_or_part )

// ============================================================================
//  PHASE 1 — NORMALIZATION (forward)
//  - Unify Arabic forms to Persian letters for stable downstream matching.
//  - Delete ZWJ (U+200D) and ASCII spaces so the token is solid.
//  - ZWNJ (U+200C) is preserved here; used as prefix-stem separator in Phase 2,
//    then deleted by Delete_ZWNJ after prefix stripping is complete.
// ============================================================================
define Normalize_Characters as (
  repeat (
    [substring] among (
      '{ar_kaf}'                                                 (<- '{kaf}')
      '{ar_ye}' '{ar_ye_with_hamza_above}'                       (<- '{ye}')
      '{ar_heh}' '{ar_he_marbuta}'                               (<- '{heh}')
      '{ar_alef_with_hamza_above}' '{ar_alef_with_hamza_below}'  (<- '{alef}')
      '{ar_vav_with_hamza_above}'                                (<- '{vav}')
      '{zero_width_joiner}'                                      ( delete )
      '{space}'                                                  ( delete )
      ''                                                         ( next )
    )
  )
)

// ============================================================================
//  PHASE 2 — PREFIX STRIPPING (forward, anchored)
//  - HPS: remove known prefixes before suffix processing.
//  - Requires ZWNJ (U+200C) between prefix and stem to avoid stripping from
//    words that begin with these syllables but are not prefixed forms
//    (e.g. بیرون، بیشتر، میلادی، میان).
//  - Sets `saw_present_prefix` when matching {mi}/{nemi} to enable person endings later.
// ============================================================================
define Strip_Prefix_At_Start as (
  [substring] among (
    '{nun}{mim}{ye}{half_space}' ($(len > 5) delete set saw_present_prefix) // NEMI‌
    '{mim}{ye}{half_space}'      ($(len > 4) delete set saw_present_prefix) // MI‌
    '{nun}{alef}{half_space}'    ($(len > 4) delete) // NA‌
    '{be}{ye}{half_space}'       ($(len > 4) delete) // BI‌
  )
)

// ============================================================================
//  PHASE 2b — DELETE REMAINING ZWNJs (forward)
//  - After prefix detection, any remaining ZWNJs (e.g. in compound words)
//    are no longer needed and are removed here.
// ============================================================================
define Delete_ZWNJ as (
  repeat (
    [substring] among (
      '{half_space}' ( delete )
      ''             ( next )
    )
  )
)

backwardmode (

// ============================================================================
//  PROBE — PROTECT LEXICAL "-AN" (not plural)
//  - HPS strips -AN as a plural; however, many stems end in orthographic "AN":
//      ...stan / ...san / ...ran (place names/lexical stems), and frequent
//      stems such as Iran/Tehran/Ensan/Ostan.
//  - We set 'protect_lex_an' per pass if a trailing pattern indicates lexical AN.
//  - This is a probe only: it NEVER edits the buffer; it only sets a flag.
// ============================================================================
  define Protect_Lexical_AN as (
    unset protect_lex_an
    do (
      AN_LexHash or (
      among (
        '{sin}{te}{alef}{nun}'  ( set protect_lex_an )  // …stan
        '{sin}{alef}{nun}'      ( set protect_lex_an )  // …san
        '{re}{alef}{nun}'       ( set protect_lex_an )  // …ran
        '{vav}{alef}{nun}'      ( set protect_lex_an )  // …van: عنوان، دیوان، جوان، روان
      )
      )
    )
  )

// ============================================================================
//  PHASE 3 — SUFFIX STRIPPING (backward)
//  - All routines in backward mode start matching from the end of the token.
//  - IMPORTANT: no successful "no-op" arms; every success must modify the text.
//    This ensures 'repeat' loops terminate.
//  - Length guards $(len > N) reduce over-stemming risk on short words.
// ============================================================================
